North Dakota, session 69, HB1024.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, to the state departments and institutions of the state of North Dakota for the
purpose of defraying their expenses for the period beginning with the effective date of this Act, and
ending June 30, 2025, as follows:
Subdivision 1.
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Salaries and wages $50,000
Operating expenses 20,000
Total general fund $70,000
Subdivision 2.
OFFICE OF MANAGEMENT AND BUDGET
Operating expenses $195,000
Total special funds $195,000
Subdivision 3.
ATTORNEY GENERAL
Statewide litigation funding pool $3,000,000
Prosecution witness fees 50,000
Total general fund $3,050,000
Subdivision 4.
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Grants - other grants $30,000,000
Total federal funds $30,000,000
Subdivision 5.
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND REHABILITATION
Adult services - excess population costs $11,500,000
Total general fund $11,500,000
Subdivision 6.
OFFICE OF THE ADJUTANT GENERAL

H. B. NO. 1024 - PAGE 2
Loan interest repayment - law enforcement costs $1,763,490
Loan repayment - disaster costs 4,294,789
Total general fund $6,058,279
Subdivision 7.
DEPARTMENT OF WATER RESOURCES
Line of credit repayment - water infrastructure revolving loan fund $10,000,000
Total resources trust fund $10,000,000
Subdivision 8.
TOTAL - SECTION 1
Grand total all funds $60,873,279
Less grand total other funds 40,195,000
Grand total general fund $20,678,279
SECTION 2. LEGISLATIVE INTENT - COST REIMBURSEMENTS - LOAN REPAYMENTS. It is
the intent of the sixty-ninth legislative assembly that the attorney general seek reimbursement from the
federal government for the costs of responding to unlawful activity associated with the construction of
the Dakota access pipeline. It is further the intent of the sixty-ninth legislative assembly that these
reimbursements be used to repay the Bank of North Dakota loans authorized by the emergency
commission and the legislative assembly which were obtained to provide the funding necessary to
respond to the unlawful activity associated with the construction of the Dakota access pipeline. It is
further the intent of the sixty-ninth legislative assembly that the provisions of section 54-16-13 apply to
the loans, except that emergency commission approval does not apply.
SECTION 3. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

H. B. NO. 1024 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1024 and that
two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 75 Nays 16 Absent 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State